Utah statutes.
62A-3-105.   Matching requirements for state and federal Older American funds.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a local area agency on aging that receives state or federal Older Americans Act Supportive Services, Older Americans Act Congregate Meals, or Older Americans Act Home Delivered Meals related funds from the division to provide programs and services under this chapter shall match those funds in an amount at least equal to:

(a)  15% of service dollars; and

(b)  25% of administrative dollars.

(2)  A local area agency on aging is not required to match cash-in-lieu funds related to the Home Delivered Meals program or congregate meals.

(3)  A local area agency on aging may include services, property, or other in-kind contributions to meet the administrative dollars match but may only use cash to meet the service dollars match.



Amended by Chapter 110, 2013 General Session

